Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,128
Information; refusal to release; prohibited.

No person or agency shall intentionally or knowingly refuse to release any information requested pursuant to section 81-5,121 or 81-5,124.

Laws 1979, LB 301, § 14.